fi: Haulikon kaliiperi: .410-kaliiperinen; Kaliiperi 10; Kaliiperi 12; Kaliiperi 14; Kaliiperi 16; Kaliiperi 20; Kaliiperi 24; Kaliiperi 28; Kaliiperi 32; Kaliiperi 8; Muu
ru: Калибр дробовика: Калибр .410; 10-й калибр; 12-й калибр; 14-й калибр; 16-й калибр; 20-й калибр; 24-й калибр; 28-й калибр; 32-й калибр; 8-й калибр; Другое
fr: Calibre du fusil de chasse: Calibre .410; Calibre 10; Calibre 12; Calibre 14; Calibre 16; Calibre 20; Calibre 24; Calibre 28; Calibre 32; Calibre 8; Autre
ko: 산탄총 구경: .410 보어; 10게이지; 12게이지; 14게이지; 16게이지; 20게이지; 24게이지; 28게이지; 32게이지; 8게이지; 기타
de: Kaliber der Schrotflinte: Kaliber .410; Kaliber 10; Kaliber 12; Kaliber 14; Kaliber 16; Kaliber 20; Kaliber 24; Kaliber 28; Kaliber 32; Kaliber 8; Andere
it: Calibro del fucile: Calibro .410; Calibro 10; Calibro 12; Calibro 14; Calibro 16; Calibro 20; Calibro 24; Calibro 28; Calibro 32; Calibro 8; Altro
vi: Thông số đo đường kính nòng súng săn: Cỡ nòng .410; Cỡ nòng 10; Cỡ nòng 12; Cỡ nòng 14; Cỡ nòng 16; Cỡ nòng 20; Cỡ nòng 24; Cỡ nòng 28; Cỡ nòng 32; Cỡ nòng 8; Khác
pt-PT: Calibre da espingarda: Calibre .410; Calibre 10; Calibre 12; Calibre 14; Calibre 16; Calibre 20; Calibre 24; Calibre 28; Calibre 32; Calibre 8; Outro
ro-RO: Calibru pentru pușca de vânătoare: Calibrul .410; Calibrul 10; Calibrul 12; Calibrul 14; Calibrul 16; Calibrul 20; Calibrul 24; Calibrul 28; Calibrul 32; Calibrul 8; Altele
sl-SI: Kaliber šibrovke: Kaliber .410; Kaliber 10; Kaliber 12; Kaliber 14; Kaliber 16; Kaliber 20; Kaliber 24; Kaliber 28; Kaliber 32; Kaliber 8; Drugo
cs: Kalibr brokovnice: .410; Ráže 10; Ráže 12; Ráže 14; Ráže 16; Ráže 20; Ráže 24; Ráže 28; Ráže 32; Ráže 8; Jiná
zh-TW: 散彈槍口徑: .410 口徑; 10 號口徑; 12 號口徑; 14 號口徑; 16 號口徑; 20 號口徑; 24 號口徑; 28 號口徑; 32 號口徑; 8 號口徑; 其他
th: เกจปืนลูกซอง: .410 บอร์; เกจ 10; เกจ 12; เกจ 14; เกจ 16; เกจ 20; เกจ 24; เกจ 28; เกจ 32; เกจ 8; อื่นๆ
da: Kaliber for haglgevær: Kaliber .410; Kaliber 10; Kaliber 12; Kaliber 14; Kaliber 16; Kaliber 20; Kaliber 24; Kaliber 28; Kaliber 32; Kaliber 8; Andet
nl: Hagelgeweer kaliber: .410 bore; 10 gauge; 12 gauge; 14 gauge; 16 gauge; 20 gauge; 24 gauge; 28 gauge; 32 gauge; 8 gauge; Overig
lt-LT: Šautuvo kalibras: .410 kalibras; 10 kalibras; 12 kalibras; 14 kalibras; 16 kalibras; 20 kalibras; 24 kalibras; 28 kalibras; 32 kalibras; 8 kalibras; Kita
bg-BG: Калибър на гладкоцевната пушка: Калибър .410; Калибър 10; Калибър 12; Калибър 14; Калибър 16; Калибър 20; Калибър 24; Калибър 28; Калибър 32; Калибър 8; Друго
pt-BR: Espingarda calibre: Calibre .410; Calibre 10; Calibre 12; Calibre 14; Calibre 16; Calibre 20; Calibre 24; Calibre 28; Calibre 32; Calibre 8; Outro
nb: Haglgeværkaliber: Kaliber .410; Kaliber 10; Kaliber 12; Kaliber 14; Kaliber 16; Kaliber 20; Kaliber 24; Kaliber 28; Kaliber 32; Kaliber 8; Annet
pl: Kaliber strzelby: Kaliber .410; Kaliber 10; Kaliber 12; Kaliber 14; Kaliber 16; Kaliber 20; Kaliber 24; Kaliber 28; Kaliber 32; Kaliber 8; Inne
ja: ショットガンゲージ: .410ボア; 10ゲージ; 12ゲージ; 14ゲージ; 16ゲージ; 20ゲージ; 24ゲージ; 28ゲージ; 32ゲージ; 8ゲージ; その他
hr-HR: Mjerač sačmarice: Kalibar .410; Kalibar 10; Kalibar 12; Kalibar 14; Kalibar 16; Kalibar 20; Kalibar 24; Kalibar 28; Kalibar 32; Kalibar 8; Drugo
sv: Hagelgevärskaliber: Kaliber .410; Kaliber 10; Kaliber 12; Kaliber 14; Kaliber 16; Kaliber 20; Kaliber 24; Kaliber 28; Kaliber 32; Kaliber 8; Övrigt
es: Calibre de escopeta: Calibre .410; Calibre 10; Calibre 12; Calibre 14; Calibre 16; Calibre 20; Calibre 24; Calibre 28; Calibre 32; Calibre 8; Otro
en: Shotgun gauge: .410 Bore; 10 Gauge; 12 Gauge; 14 Gauge; 16 Gauge; 20 Gauge; 24 Gauge; 28 Gauge; 32 Gauge; 8 Gauge; Other
sk-SK: Kaliber brokovnice: Kaliber .410; Kaliber 10; Kaliber 12; Kaliber 14; Kaliber 16; Kaliber 20; Kaliber 24; Kaliber 28; Kaliber 32; Kaliber 8; Iné
el: Διαμέτρημα καραμπίνας: Διαμέτρημα .410; Διαμέτρημα 10; Διαμέτρημα 12; Διαμέτρημα 14; Διαμέτρημα 16; Διαμέτρημα 20; Διαμέτρημα 24; Διαμέτρημα 28; Διαμέτρημα 32; Διαμέτρημα 8; Άλλο
hu: Sörétes puska kalibere: .410-es kaliber; 10-es kaliber; 12-es kaliber; 14-es kaliber; 16-os kaliber; 20-as kaliber; 24-es kaliber; 28-as kaliber; 32-es kaliber; 8-as kaliber; Egyéb
zh-CN: 霰弹枪口径: .410 口径; 10 号; 12 号; 14 号; 16 号; 20 号; 24 号; 28 号; 32 号; 8 号; 其他
tr: Av tüfeği kalibresi: .410 kalibre; 10 kalibre; 12 kalibre; 14 kalibre; 16 kalibre; 20 kalibre; 24 kalibre; 28 kalibre; 32 kalibre; 8 kalibre; Diğer